Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8308.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 27 of the General Laws entitled "INSURANCE" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 84
PRIMARY CARE CONTRACTING GOOD FAITH ACT
27-84-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Primary Care Contracting Good Faith
Act."
27-84-2. Mandatory good-faith negotiations.
(a) As used in this chapter, the term "payer" means and includes commercial insurers,
managed care organizations, and Medicare advantage plans.
(b) Every payer shall negotiate in good faith with any primary care physician practice at
least once every twenty-four (24) months. Negotiations shall explicitly consider increases in
operating costs, inflation, staff wages, malpractice premiums, and other overhead factors.
27-84-3. Prohibition on discriminatory refusals.
A payer shall not refuse to negotiate or enter/renew a contract solely based on the practice’s
size, ownership structure, patient panel size, or Medicaid volume.
27-84-4. Enforcement.
The office of the health insurance commissioner (“OHIC”) shall maintain a negotiation
request log and issue annual summary reports. Complaints shall be reviewed under existing OHIC

authority.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect ninety (90) days after passage.
========
LC006084
========
LC006084 - Page 2 of 3